Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.224

Washington professional educator standards board—Standards for computer science endorsement.

The professional educator standards board shall, in its regular review and revision of teacher certification standards as required by RCW 28A.410.210, develop standards for a K-12 computer science endorsement. Standards related to computer science shall be adopted by January 15, 2016. The revised standards shall be aligned with the computer science learning standards developed by a nationally recognized computer science education organization and updated to include the standards adopted by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.300.585. In addition to appropriate computer science content, the computer science endorsement standards must facilitate dual endorsement in computer science and mathematics or science, or another related endorsement in high demand as indicated by a school district.

[ 2015 1st sp.s. c 3 s 2.]